Maryland, session 2025, HB0797.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Government
9–1E–07.
(b) (1) The findings and evidence relied on by the General Assembly for the
continuation of the Minority Business Enterprise Program under Title 14, Subtitle 3 of the
State Finance and Procurement Article are incorporated in this subsection.
(2) To the extent practicable and authorized by the United States
Constitution, a sports wagering licensee shall comply with the State’s Minority Business
Enterprise Program.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0797*

HOUSE BILL 797
(3) (i) On or before 6 months after the issuance of a sports wagering
license under this subtitle, the Governor’s Office of Small, Minority, and Women Business
Affairs, in consultation with the Office of the Attorney General and the sports wagering
licensee, shall establish a clear plan for setting reasonable and appropriate minority
business enterprise participation goals and procedures for the procurement of goods and
services related to sports wagering, including procurement of construction, equipment, and
ongoing services.
(ii) To the extent practicable, the goals and procedures specified in
subparagraph (i) of this paragraph shall be based on the requirements of Title 14, Subtitle
3 of the State Finance and Procurement Article and the regulations implementing that
subtitle.
(4) On or after July 1, [2024] 2026, the provisions of this subsection and
any regulations adopted under this subsection shall be of no effect and may not be enforced.
9–1E–15.
(h) (4) The Sports Wagering Application Review Commission shall:
(i) to the extent permitted by federal and State law, actively seek to
achieve racial, ethnic, and gender diversity when awarding licenses; [and]
(ii) encourage applicants who qualify as a minority business
enterprise, as defined in § 14–301 of the State Finance and Procurement Article, or who
are small, minority, or women–owned business entities to apply for sports wagering
licenses under this subtitle; AND
(III) SUBJECT TO THE LIMITATIONS UNDER § 9–1E–06 OF THIS
SUBTITLE, ACCEPT AND CONSIDER AN APPLICATION FOR A SPORTS WAGERING
LICENSE THAT IS SUBMITTED BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2027.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.